Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. TRANSFER The State Treasurer shall transfer to
the ROA-25 Revolving Fund created pursuant to Enrolled House Bill
No. 2781 of the 1st Regular Session of the 60th Oklahoma
Legislature, from the Perform Fund created in Section 3646.5 of
Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the sum of One Hundred Eighty
Million Dollars ($180,000,000.00) to be budgeted and expended in
accordance with law.

HB2767 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 2. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce is hereby
authorized to transfer to the ROA-25 Revolving Fund created pursuant
to Enrolled House Bill No. 2781 of the 1st Regular Session of the
60th Oklahoma Legislature, from the monies appropriated to the
Oklahoma Department of Commerce by Section 1 of Enrolled Senate Bill
1179 of the 1st Session of the 59th Oklahoma Legislature the sum of
Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00) to be budgeted and
expended in accordance with law.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JOINT COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
AND BUDGET, dated 05/19/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended










HB2767 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.